Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 13 Rhode Island Code of Military Justice
30-13-34.
Investigation.

No charge or specification may be referred to a general court-martial for trial until a thorough and impartial investigation of all the matters set forth therein has been made. This investigation shall include inquiry as to the truth of the matter set forth in the charges, consideration of the form of charges, and a recommendation as to the disposition that should be made of the case in the interest of justice and discipline.

The accused shall be advised of the charges against him or her and of his or her right to be represented at that investigation by counsel. Upon the accused’s own request, he or she shall be represented by civilian counsel if provided by him or her; or military counsel of his or her own selection if military counsel is reasonably available; or by counsel detailed by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command. At that investigation, full opportunity shall be given to the accused to cross-examine witnesses against him or her if they are available, and to present anything he or she may desire in his or her own behalf, either in defense or mitigation, and the investigating officer shall examine witnesses requested by the accused. If the charges are forwarded after the investigation, they shall be accompanied by a statement of the substance of the testimony taken on both sides and a copy thereof shall be given to the accused.

If an investigation of the subject matter of an offense has been conducted before the accused is charged with the offense, and if the accused was present at the investigation and afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examinations, and presentation prescribed in subsection (b) of this section, no further investigation of that charge is necessary under this section unless it is demanded by the accused after he or she is informed of the charge. A demand for further investigation entitles the accused to recall witnesses for further cross-examination and to offer any new evidence in his or her own behalf.

The requirements of this section are binding on all persons administering this code, but failure to follow them does not divest a military court of jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-34

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-35.
Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial, the commanding officer shall, within eight (8) days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation and allied papers, to the governor. If that is not practicable, the commanding officer shall report, in writing, to the governor the reasons for delay.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-35

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-36.
Advice of state judge advocate and reference for trial.

Before directing the trial of any charge by general court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to the state judge advocate for consideration and advice. The convening authority may not refer a charge to a general court-martial for trial unless he or she has found that the charge alleges an offense under this code and is warranted by evidence indicated in the report of the investigation.

If the charges or specifications are not formally correct or do not conform to the substance of the evidence contained in the report of the investigating officer, formal corrections, and such changes in the charges and specifications as are needed to make them conform to the evidence, may be made.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-36

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-37.
Service of charges.

The trial counsel to whom court-martial charges are referred for trial shall cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges upon which trial is to be had. In time of peace, no person may, against his or her objection, be brought to trial before a general court-martial within a period of five (5) days after the service of the charges upon the person, or before a special court-martial within a period of three (3) days after the service of the charges upon the person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-37

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-38.
Confinement pending trial — Bail.

When an accused person shall have been arrested for failure to appear before a court-martial for trial, the president of the court-martial or summary court officer to whom the charges have been referred for trial may issue a commitment for the confinement of that person pending trial. In these cases, the accused shall be admitted to bail, the amount of bail fixed, and the surety or sureties thereon approved by the president of the court-martial or the summary court officer issuing the commitment. In default of bail, that person shall be confined pending trial. No person shall be kept in confinement pending trial for more than five (5) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-38

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-39.
Governor may prescribe procedure.

The procedure, including modes of proof, in cases before military courts and other military tribunals may be prescribed by the governor by regulations, which shall, so far as he or she considers practicable, apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence generally recognized in the trial of criminal cases in the courts of the state, but which may not be contrary to, or inconsistent with, this code.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-39

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-40.
Unlawfully influencing action of court.

No authority convening a general, special, or summary court-martial nor any other commanding officer, or officer serving on the staff thereof, may censure, reprimand, or admonish the court or any member, law officer, or counsel thereof, with respect to the findings or sentence adjudged by the court, or with respect to any other exercise of its, or his or her functions in the conduct of the proceeding. No person subject to this code may attempt to coerce or, by any unauthorized means, influence the action of the court-martial or any other military tribunal, or any member thereof, or an investigating officer, in reaching the findings or sentence in any case, or the action of any convening, approving, or reviewing authority with respect to his or her judicial acts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-40

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-41.
Duties of trial counsel and defense counsel.

The trial counsel of a general or special court-martial shall prosecute in the name of the state, and shall, under the direction of the court, prepare the record of the proceedings.

The accused has the right to be represented in his or her defense before a general or special court-martial by civilian counsel if provided by the accused, or by military counsel of his or her own selection if reasonably available, or by the defense counsel detailed under §

30-13-29

. Should the accused have counsel of his or her own selection, the defense counsel, and assistant defense counsel, if any, who were detailed, shall, if the accused so desires, act as his or her associate counsel; otherwise they shall be excused by the president of the court.

In every court-martial proceeding, the defense counsel may, in the event of conviction, forward for attachment to the record of proceedings a brief of those matters counsel feels should be considered in behalf of the accused on review, including any objection to the contents of the record that he or she considers appropriate.

An assistant trial counsel of a general court-martial may, under the direction of the trial counsel or when he or she is qualified to be a trial counsel as required by §

30-13-29

, perform any duty imposed by law, regulation, or the custom of the service, upon the trial counsel of the court. An assistant trial counsel of a special court-martial may perform any duty of the trial counsel.

An assistant defense counsel of a general or special court-martial may, under the direction of the defense counsel or when he or she is qualified to be the defense counsel as required by §

30-13-29

, perform any duty imposed by law, regulation, or the custom of the service, upon counsel for the accused.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-41

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-42.
Sessions.

Whenever a general or special court-martial deliberates or votes, only the members of the court may be present. After a general court-martial has finally voted on the findings, the court may request the law officer and the reporter to appear before the court to put the findings in proper form and those proceedings shall be on the record. All other proceedings, including any other consultation of the court with counsel or the law officer, shall be made a part of the record and shall be in the presence of the accused, the defense counsel, the trial counsel, and, in general court-martial cases, the law officer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-42

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-43.
Continuances.

A court-martial may, for reasonable cause, grant a continuance to any party for such time, and as often, as may appear to be just.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-43

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-44.
Challenges.

Members of a general or special court-martial and the law officer of a general court-martial, may be challenged by the accused or the trial counsel for cause stated to the court. The court shall determine the relevancy and validity of challenges for cause, but may not receive a challenge to more than one person at a time. Challenges by the trial counsel shall ordinarily be presented and decided before those by the accused are offered.

Each accused and the trial counsel is entitled to one peremptory challenge, but the law officer may not be challenged except for cause.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-44

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-45.
Oaths.

The law officer, interpreters, and, in general and special courts-martial, members, trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, assistant defense counsel, and reporters shall take an oath or affirmation in the presence of the accused to perform their duties faithfully.

Each witness before a military court shall be examined on oath or affirmation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-45

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-46.
Statute of limitations.

A person charged with desertion or absence without leave in time of war, or with aiding the enemy or mutiny, may be tried and punished at any time without limitation.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person charged with desertion in time of peace or with the offense punishable under §

30-13-116

is not liable to be tried by court-martial if the offense was committed more than three (3) years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by court-martial or punished under §

30-13-15

if the offense was committed more than two (2) years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command, or before the imposition of punishment under §

30-13-15

.

Periods in which the accused was absent from territory in which the state has the authority to apprehend him or her, or in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-46

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-47.
Double jeopardy.

No person may, without his or her consent, be tried a second time in any military court of the state for the same offense.

No proceeding in which an accused has been found guilty by a court-martial upon any charge or specification is a “trial” in the sense of this section until the finding of guilty has become final after review of the case has been fully completed.

A proceeding which, after the introduction of evidence but before a finding, is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses without any fault of the accused is a “trial” in the sense of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-47

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-48.
Entering of not-guilty plea by court.

If an accused arraigned before a court-martial makes an irregular pleading; or after a plea of guilty sets up matters inconsistent with the plea; or if it appears that the accused has entered the plea of guilty improvidently or through lack of understanding of its meaning and effect; or if the accused fails or refuses to plead; a plea of not guilty shall be entered in the record, and the court shall proceed as though he or she had pleaded not guilty.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-48

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-49.
Opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence.

The trial counsel, the defense counsel, and the court-martial shall have equal opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence in accordance with such regulations as the governor may prescribe.

The president of a court-martial or a summary court officer may:

Issue a warrant for the arrest of any accused person who, having been served with a warrant and a copy of the charges, disobeys a written order by the convening authority to appear before the court;

Issue subpoenas duces tecum and other subpoenas;

Enforce, by attachment, the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers; and

Sentence persons for refusal to be sworn or to answer, as provided in actions before civil courts of the state.

Process issued in court-martial cases to compel witnesses to appear and testify and to compel the production of other evidence shall run to any part of the state and shall be executed by civil officers as prescribed by the laws of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-49

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-50.
Refusal to appear or testify.

Any person not subject to this code who:

Has been duly subpoenaed to appear as a witness or to produce books and records before a military court or before any military or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before a military court;

Has been duly paid or tendered the fees and mileage of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending the superior courts of the state; and

Willfully neglects or refuses to appear, or refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce any evidence which that person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce;

is guilty of an offense against the state and a military court may punish that person in the same manner as the civil courts of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-50

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-51.
Contempt.

A military court may punish for contempt any person who uses any menacing word, sign, or gesture in its presence, or who disturbs its proceedings by any riot or disorder. The punishment may not exceed confinement for thirty (30) days or a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-51

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-52.
Depositions.

At any time after charges have been signed, as provided in §

30-13-32

, any party may take oral or written depositions unless an authority competent to convene a court-martial for the trial of those charges forbids it for good cause. If a deposition is to be taken before charges are referred for trial, the authority may designate commissioned officers to represent the prosecution and the defense and may authorize those officers to take the deposition of any witness.

The party at whose instance a deposition is to be taken shall give to every other party reasonable written notice of the time and place for taking the deposition.

Depositions may be taken before, and authenticated by, any military or civil officer authorized by the laws of the state or by the laws of the place where the deposition is taken to administer oaths.

A duly authenticated deposition taken upon reasonable notice to the other parties, so far as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence, may be read in evidence before any court-martial or in any proceeding before a court of inquiry, if it appears:

That the witness resides or is beyond the state in which the court-martial or court of inquiry is ordered to sit, or beyond the distance of one hundred (100) miles from the place of trial or hearing;

That the witness by reason of death, age, sickness, bodily infirmity, imprisonment, military necessity, nonamenability to process, or other reasonable cause, is unable or refuses to appear and testify in person at the place of trial or hearing; or

That the present whereabouts of the witness is unknown.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-52

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-53.
Admissibility of records of courts of inquiry.

In any case not extending to the dismissal of a commissioned officer, the sworn testimony, contained in the duly authenticated record of proceedings of a court of inquiry, of a person whose oral testimony cannot be obtained may, if otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence, be read in evidence by any party before a court-martial if the accused was a party before the court of inquiry and had the opportunity to cross-examine the witness and if the same issue was involved or if the accused consents to the introduction of the evidence.

This testimony may be read in evidence only by the defense in cases extending to the dismissal of a commissioned officer.

This testimony may also be read in evidence before a court of inquiry or a military board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-53

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-54.
Voting and rulings by court-martial.

Voting by members of a general or special court-martial upon questions of challenge, on the findings, and on the sentence shall be by secret written ballot, provided that, upon questions of challenge, the challenged member shall not be entitled to vote. The junior member of the court shall in each case count the votes. The count shall be checked by the president, who shall forthwith announce the result of the ballot to the members of the court.

The law officer of a general court-martial and the president of a special court-martial shall rule upon interlocutory questions, other than challenge, arising during the proceedings. Any ruling made by the law officer of a general court-martial or by the president of a special court-martial upon any interlocutory question other than a motion for a finding of not guilty, or the question of the accused’s sanity, is final and constitutes the ruling of the court. However, the law officer or president may change the ruling at any time during the trial except a ruling on a motion for a finding of not guilty that was granted. Unless the ruling is final, if any member objects thereto, the court shall be cleared and closed and the question decided by a voice vote, as provided in §

30-13-55

, beginning with the junior in rank.

Before a vote is taken on the findings, the law officer of a general court-martial and the president of a special court-martial shall, in the presence of the accused and counsel, instruct the court as to the elements of the offense and charge the court:

That the accused must be presumed to be innocent until his or her guilt is established by legal and competent evidence beyond reasonable doubt;

That in the case being considered, if there is a reasonable doubt as to the guilt of the accused, the doubt must be resolved in favor of the accused and he or she must be acquitted;

That, if there is a reasonable doubt as to the degree of guilt, the finding must be in a lower degree as to which there is no reasonable doubt; and

That the burden of proof of establishing the guilt of the accused beyond reasonable doubt is upon the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-54

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-55.
Number of votes required.

No person may be convicted of an offense, except by concurrence of two-thirds (2/3) of the members present at the time the vote is taken.

All sentences shall be determined by the concurrence of two-thirds (2/3) of the members present at the time that the vote is taken.

All other questions to be decided by the members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority vote. A tie vote on a challenge disqualifies the member challenged. A tie vote on a motion for a finding of not guilty or on a motion relating to the question of the accused’s sanity is a determination against the accused. A tie vote on any other question is a determination in favor of the accused.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-55

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-56.
Court to announce action.

A court-martial shall announce its findings and sentence to the parties as soon as determined.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-56

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-57.
Record of trial.

Each court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings of the trial of each case brought before it and the record shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and the law officer. If the record cannot be authenticated by either the president or the law officer by reason of his or her death, disability, or absence, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of him or her. If both the president and the law officer are unavailable, the record shall be authenticated by two (2) members. A record of the proceedings of a trial in which the sentence adjudged includes dishonorable discharge, dismissal, or bad-conduct discharge, or is more than that which could be adjudged by a special court-martial, shall contain a verbatim account of the proceedings and testimony before the court. All other records of trial shall contain such matters and be authenticated in such a manner as the governor may by regulation prescribe.

A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as it is authenticated. If a verbatim record of trial by general court-martial is not required by subsection (a) of this section, but has been made, the accused may buy the verbatim record under such regulations as the governor may prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-57

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-58.
Cruel and unusual punishment prohibited.

Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment, may not be adjudged by any court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-58

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-59.
Maximum limits.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense may not exceed the limits prescribed by this code.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-59

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-60.
Effective date of sentences.

Whenever a sentence of a court-martial lawfully adjudged and approved includes a forfeiture of pay or allowances in addition to confinement not suspended, the forfeiture may apply to pay or allowances becoming due on or after the date the sentence is approved by the convening authority. No forfeiture may extend to any pay or allowances accrued before that date.

Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement. Regulations prescribed by the governor may provide that sentences of confinement may not be executed until approved by designated officers.

All other sentences of courts-martial are effective on the date ordered executed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-60

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-61.
Execution of confinement.

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a military court, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place of confinement under the control of any of the forces of the state military forces or in any jail, penitentiary, or prison designated for that purpose. Persons so confined in a jail, penitentiary, or prison are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed to the jail, penitentiary, or prison by the courts of the state or of any political subdivision thereof.

The omission of the words “hard labor” from any sentence or punishment of a court-martial adjudging confinement does not deprive the authority executing that sentence or punishment of the power to require hard labor as a part of the punishment.

The keepers, officers, and wardens of city or county jails and of other jails, penitentiaries, or prisons designated by the governor, or by such a person as the governor may authorize to act under §

30-13-11

, shall receive persons ordered into confinement before trial and persons committed to confinement by a military court and shall confine them according to law. No keeper, officer, or warden may require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving or confining a person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-61

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-62.
Approval of sentence.

Except as provided in §§

30-13-22

and

30-13-68

, a court-martial sentence, unless suspended, may be ordered executed by the convening authority when approved by him or her and his or her staff judge advocate or, in the absence of a staff judge advocate on the staff of the convening authority, by the staff judge advocate of the next highest command. The convening authority shall approve the sentence or such a part, amount, or commuted form of the sentence as the convening authority sees fit, and may suspend the execution of the sentence as approved by him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-62

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-63.
Initial action on the record.

After a trial by court-martial, the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, as reviewing authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-63

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-64.
Opinion of judge advocate.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each court-martial to the staff judge advocate or, in the absence of a staff judge advocate on the staff of the convening authority, to the staff judge advocate of the next higher command, who shall submit his or her written opinion thereon to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-64

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-65.
Reconsideration and revision of record.

If a specification before a court-martial has been dismissed on motion and the ruling does not amount to a finding of not guilty, the convening authority may return the record to the court for reconsideration of the ruling and any further appropriate action.

Where there is an apparent error or omission in the record or where the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to a finding or sentence that can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused, the convening authority may return the record to the court for appropriate action. In no case, however, may the record be returned:

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty or a ruling that amounts to a finding of not guilty;

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless the record shows a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge, which sufficiently alleges a violation of some section of this code; or

For increasing the severity of the sentence unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-65

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-66.
Rehearings.

If the convening authority disapproves the findings and sentence of a court-martial, he or she may, except where there is lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. In that case, the convening authority shall state the reasons for disapproval. If the convening authority disapproves the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall dismiss the charges.

Each rehearing shall take place before a court-martial composed of members not members of the court-martial that first heard the case. Upon a rehearing, the accused may not be tried for any offense of which he or she was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of, or more severe than, the original sentence may be imposed, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings, or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-66

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-67.
Approval by convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such a part or amount of the sentence, as he or she finds correct in law and fact and as he or she in his or her discretion determines should be approved. Unless the convening authority indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-67

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-68.
Review of records.

If the convening authority is the governor, his or her action on the review of any record of trial is final.

In all other cases not covered by subsection (a) of this section, if the sentence of a special court-martial as approved in accordance with the provisions of §

30-13-62

includes a bad-conduct discharge, whether or not suspended, the entire record shall be sent to the appropriate staff judge advocate or legal officer of the next higher command not having previously reviewed the record pursuant to §

30-13-62

, if any there be, to be reviewed in the same manner as a record of trial by general court-martial. The record and the opinion of the staff judge advocate or legal officer shall then be sent to the state judge advocate for review.

All other special and summary court-martial records shall be sent to the law specialist or legal officer of the appropriate force of the state military forces and shall be acted upon, transmitted, and disposed of as may be prescribed by regulations prescribed by the governor.

The state judge advocate shall review the record of trial in each case sent to him or her for review as provided under subsection (b) of this section. If the final action of the court-martial has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion of the state judge advocate is limited to questions of jurisdiction.

The state judge advocate shall take final action in any case reviewable by him or her.

In a case reviewable by the state judge advocate under this section, the state judge advocate may act only with respect to the findings and sentence as approved by the convening authority. The state judge advocate may affirm only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such a part or amount of the sentence, as he or she finds correct in law and fact and determines, on the basis of the entire record, should be approved. In considering the record, the state judge advocate may weigh the evidence, judge the credibility of witnesses, and determine controverted questions of fact, recognizing that the trial court saw and heard the witnesses. If the state judge advocate sets aside the findings and sentence, he or she may, except where the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. If the state judge advocate sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall order that the charges be dismissed.

In a case reviewable by the state judge advocate under this section, he or she shall instruct the convening authority to act in accordance with his or her decision on the review. If the state judge advocate has ordered a rehearing but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable within a reasonable time, he or she shall dismiss the charges.

The state judge advocate may order one or more boards of review each composed of not less than three (3) commissioned officers of the state military forces, each of whom must be a member of the bar of the highest court of the state. Each board of review shall review the record of any trial by special court-martial, including a sentence to a bad-conduct discharge, referred to it by the state judge advocate. Boards of review have the same authority on review as the state judge advocate has under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-68

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-69.
Error of law — Lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-69

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-70.
Review counsel.

Upon the final review of a sentence of a general court-martial or of a sentence to a bad-conduct discharge, the accused has the right to be represented by counsel before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate or legal officer, as the case may be, and before the state judge advocate.

Upon the request of an accused entitled to be so represented, the state judge advocate shall appoint a lawyer who is a member of the state military forces and who has the qualifications prescribed in §

30-13-29

, if available, to represent the accused before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate or legal officer, as the case may be, and before the state judge advocate, in the review of cases specified in subsection (a) of this section.

If provided by him or her, an accused entitled to be so represented may be represented by civilian counsel before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate or legal officer, as the case may be, and before the state judge advocate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-70

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-71.
Vacation of suspension.

Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence that, as approved, includes a bad-conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on the alleged violation of probation. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by counsel if he or she so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the governor in cases involving a general court-martial sentence and to the commanding officer of the force of the state military forces of which the probationer is a member in all other cases covered by subsection (a) of this section. If the governor or commanding officer vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence, except a dismissal, shall be executed.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-71

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-72.
Petition for new trial.

At any time within two (2) years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence that extends to dismissal, or dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, the accused may petition the governor for a new trial on the grounds of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-72

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-73.
Remission and suspension of sentence — Substitution of administrative discharge.

A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures.

The governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-73

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-74.
Restoration following sentence set aside.

Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence that has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and the executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon a new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of his or her enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the governor alone to such a commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the governor that former officer would have attained had he or she not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer may be made if a position vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization. All time between the dismissal and reappointment shall be considered as service for all purposes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-74

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 37.

30-13-75.
Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences.

The proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as reviewed and approved, as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following review and approval, as required by this code, are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all actions taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in §

30-13-72

of this code.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-75

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.

30-13-76.
Persons to be tried or punished.

No person may be tried or punished for any offense provided for in §§

30-13-77

—

30-13-120

, unless it was committed while that person was in a duty status.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-13-76

; P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 1.